src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
!! UDMURT Pronoun inflection

!! Udmurt adjectives inflect for:

!! * Number
!! * Case
!! * Determinativity (Absolutive / Determinative)
!! * Comparative (TODO: can comparative co-occur with other stuff?)

!! ###  Determinative notes

!! When an adjective occurs in determinative, it must agree for number and case.
!! However, when determinative co-occurs with certain cases, these cases
!! have alternate forms.

!! The cases with alternate forms are:

!! * Accusative singular, plural
!! * Inessive singular, plural
!! * Illative singular, plural
!! * Elative singular, plural

!! Note that these alternative suffixes have palatal and non-palatal versions

!! |  Nom.   | бадӟым-ез гурт          | бадӟым-ъёс-ыз гурт-ъёс
!! |  Iness. | бадӟым-а-з гурт-ын      | бадӟым-ъёс-а-з гурт-ъёс-ын
!! |  Illat. | бадӟым-а-з гурт-э       | бадӟым-ъёс-а-з гурт-ъёс-ы
!! |  Elat.  | бадӟым-ысьты-з гурт-ысь | бадӟым-ъёс-ысьты-з гурт-ъёс-ысь

!! |  Nom.   | пичи-ез бакча           | пичи-ос-ыз бакча-ос
!! |  Iness. | пичи-я-з бакча-ын       | пичи-ос-а-з бакча-ос-ын
!! |  Illat. | пичи-я-з бакча-е        | пичи-ос-а-з бакча-ос-ы
!! |  Elat.  | пичи-ысьты-з бакча-ысь  | пичи-ос-ысьты-з бакча-ос-ысь

!! TODO: ordering of suffixes sometimes differs? Compare this with possession morph.


!! words with this contlex have not been examined

LEXICON PRONOUN-TYPES
 PERS ;
 INTERR ;
 INDEFINITE-PRON ;
! NEG-PRON ;
 COLL-PRON ;
 REFL-PRON ;
 RECIPROC ;

LEXICON PERS                        !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
мон+Pron+Pers+Sg1:м PRON-PERS-SG1_ ;    !!≈ * **@CODE@** ...
тон+Pron+Pers+Sg2:т PRON-PERS-SG2_ ;
со+Pron+Pers+Sg3:со PRON-PERS-SG3_ ;
мон+Pron+Pers+Pl1:ми PRON-PERS-PL1_ ;
тон+Pron+Pers+Pl2:тӥ PRON-PERS-PL2_ ; 
со+Pron+Pers+Pl3:соос PRON-PERS-PL3_ ;


LEXICON PRON_
: # ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG1_ !! мон:м
+Nom:он K ;
+Gen:ынам K ;
+Dat:ыным K ;
+Abl:ынэсьтым K ;
+Acc:онэ K ;
+Ins:онэн K ;
+Ins:онэным K ;
+Abe:онтэк K ;
+Apr:онлань K ;
+Advl:онъя K ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2_ !тон:т
+Nom:он K ;
+Gen:ынад K ;
+Dat:ыныд K ;
+Abl:ынэсьтыд K ;
+Acc:онэ K ;
+Ins:онэн K ;
+Ins:онэныд K ;
+Abe:онтэк K ;
+Apr:онлань K ;
+Advl:онъя K ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3_ !со:со
 NOM_THEN_K ;
 GEN_THEN_K ;
 DAT_THEN_K ;
 ABL_THEN_K ;
+Acc:е K ;
 INS_IN_THEN_K ;
 ABE_THEN_K ;
 APR_THEN_K ;
+Advl:я K ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL1_ !!мон:ми
 NOM_THEN_K ;
+Gen:лям K ;
+Dat:лемлы K ;
+Dat:лем K ;
+Abl:лэсьтым K ;
+Acc:лемыз K ;
+Acc:лемды K ;
+Ins:лемын K ;
+Ins:ленымы K ;
+Abe:тэк K ;
+Apr:лань K ;
+Advl:я K ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL2_ !!тон:тӥ
 NOM_THEN_K ;
+Gen:ляд K ;
+Dat:ледлы K ;
+Dat:лед K ;
+Abl:лэсьтыд K ;
+Acc:ледыз K ;
+Acc:ледды K ;
+Ins:ледын K ;
+Ins:леныды K ;
+Abe:тэк K ;
+Apr:лань K ;
+Advl:я K ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL3_ !!со:соос
 NOM_THEN_K ;
 GEN_THEN_K ;
 DAT_THEN_K ;
 ABL_THEN_K ;
+Acc:ыз K ;
+Acc:ты K ;!? Dial/Northern
+Ins:ын K ;
 ABE_THEN_K ;
 APR_THEN_K ;
+Advl:ъя K ;

!LEXICON PRON-PERS-MUTUAL
! NOM_THEN_K ;
! APR_THEN_K ;
!+Advl:%>ъя K ;
! ABE_THEN_K ;
! DAT_THEN_K ; !sg3

!LEXICON ADJ_SG/PL_DETERM_CASE
!+Gen+Det:%>%^Е3злэн K ;
!+Abl+Det:%>%^Е3злэсь K ;
!+Ins+Det:%>%^Е3ныз K ;
!+Ine+Det:%>%^А3з K ;
!+Ill+Det:%>%^А3з K ;
!+Ela+Det:%>ысьтыз K ;
!+Ela+Det:%>ысеныз K ;
!+Ter+Det:%>озяз K ;
!+Prl+Det:%>%^Е3тӥз K ;

LEXICON INTERR
мар+Pron+Interr+Nom:мар K ;
кин+Pron+Interr+Nom:кин K ;

LEXICON COLL-PRON
ваньмы+Pron+Indef+Pl1:ваньмы MUTUAL-UNIV-PERS-PRON ; !CHECKME 2019-06-08
ваньды+Pron+Indef+Pl2:ваньды MUTUAL-UNIV-PERS-PRON ;
ваньзы+Pron+Indef+Pl3:ваньзы MUTUAL-UNIV-PERS-PRON ;

кыкнамы+Pron+AssocColl+Pl1:кыкнамы MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;
кыкнады+Pron+AssocColl+Pl2:кыкнады MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;
кыкназы+Pron+AssocColl+Pl3:кыкназы MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;

куиньнамы+Pron+AssocColl+Pl1:куиньнамы MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;
куиньнады+Pron+AssocColl+Pl2:куиньнады MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;
куиньназы+Pron+AssocColl+Pl3:куиньназы MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;

ньыльнамы+Pron+AssocColl+Pl1:ньыльнамы MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;
ньыльнады+Pron+AssocColl+Pl2:ньыльнады MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;
ньыльназы+Pron+AssocColl+Pl3:ньыльназы MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;

витьнамы+Pron+AssocColl+Pl1:витьнамы MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;
витьнады+Pron+AssocColl+Pl2:витьнады MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;
витьназы+Pron+AssocColl+Pl3:витьназы MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;

куатьнамы+Pron+AssocColl+Pl1:куатьнамы MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;
куатьнады+Pron+AssocColl+Pl2:куатьнады MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;
куатьназы+Pron+AssocColl+Pl3:куатьназы MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;

сизьымнамы+Pron+AssocColl+Pl1:сизьымнамы MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;
сизьымнады+Pron+AssocColl+Pl2:сизьымнады MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;
сизьымназы+Pron+AssocColl+Pl3:сизьымназы MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;

тямыснамы+Pron+AssocColl+Pl1:тямыснамы MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;
тямыснады+Pron+AssocColl+Pl2:тямыснады MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;
тямысназы+Pron+AssocColl+Pl3:тямысназы MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;

укмыснамы+Pron+AssocColl+Pl1:укмыснамы MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;
укмыснады+Pron+AssocColl+Pl2:укмыснады MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;
укмысназы+Pron+AssocColl+Pl3:укмысназы MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL ;

LEXICON MUTUAL-UNIV-PERS-PRON
 NOM_THEN_K ;
 GEN_THEN_K ;
 DAT_THEN_K ;

LEXICON MUTUAL-ASSOC-COLL
 NOM_THEN_K ;
+Acc:%>%{еэ%}с K ;
 DAT_THEN_K ;
 GEN_THEN_K ;
 ABL_THEN_K ;



LEXICON REFL-PRON
ачим+Pron+Refl+Sg1+Nom:ачим K ;
ачид+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Nom:ачид K ;
ачиз+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Nom:ачиз K ;
ачим+Pron+Refl+Pl1+Nom:асьмеос K ;
ачид+Pron+Refl+Pl2+Nom:асьтэос K ;
ачиз+Pron+Refl+Pl3+Nom:асьсэос K ;

ачим+Pron+Refl+Sg1+Acc:асьме K ;
ачид+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Acc:асьтэ K ;
ачиз+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Acc:асьсэ K ;
ачим+Pron+Refl+Pl1+Acc:асьмес K ;
ачид+Pron+Refl+Pl2+Acc:асьтэс K ;
ачиз+Pron+Refl+Pl3+Acc:асьсэс K ;

ачим+Pron+Refl+Sg1+Gen:ачимлэн K ;

ачим+Pron+Refl+Sg1+Gen:аслам K ;
ачид+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Gen:аслад K ;
ачиз+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Gen:аслаз K ;
ачим+Pron+Refl+Sg1+Dat:аслым K ;
ачид+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Dat:аслыд K ;
ачиз+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Dat:аслыз K ;
ачим+Pron+Refl+Pl1:асьме MUTUAL-REFL ;
ачид+Pron+Refl+Pl2:асьтэ MUTUAL-REFL ;
ачиз+Pron+Refl+Pl3:асьсэ MUTUAL-REFL ;

LEXICON MUTUAL-REFL
+Dat:лы K ;
+Abl:лэсь K ;
+Gen:лэн K ;

LEXICON RECIPROC
ог-огмы+v1+Pron+Recip+Pl1+Nom:ог-огмы MUTUAL-RECIPROC ;
ог-огмы+v2+Pron+Recip+Pl1+Nom:одӥг-огмы MUTUAL-RECIPROC ;
ог-огмы+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl1+Nom:одӥгмы-огмы K ;
ог-огды+v1+Pron+Recip+Pl2+Nom:ог-огды MUTUAL-RECIPROC ;
ог-огды+v2+Pron+Recip+Pl2+Nom:одӥг-огды MUTUAL-RECIPROC ;
ог-огды+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl2+Nom:одӥгды-огды K ;
ог-огзы+v1+Pron+Recip+Pl3+Nom:ог-огзы MUTUAL-RECIPROC ;
ог-огзы+v2+Pron+Recip+Pl3+Nom:одӥг-огзы MUTUAL-RECIPROC ;
ог-огзы+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl3+Nom:одӥгзы-огзы K ;

ог-огмы+v1+Pron+Recip+Pl1+Acc:ог-огмес K ;
ог-огмы+v2+Pron+Recip+Pl1+Acc:одӥг-огмес K ;
ог-огмы+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl1+Acc:одӥгмес-огмы K ;
ог-огды+v1+Pron+Recip+Pl2+Acc:ог-огдэс K ;
ог-огды+v2+Pron+Recip+Pl2+Acc:одӥг-огдэс K ;
ог-огды+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl2+Acc:одӥгдэс-огды K ;
ог-огзы+v1+Pron+Recip+Pl3+Acc:ог-огзэс K ;
ог-огзы+v2+Pron+Recip+Pl3+Acc:одӥг-огзэс K ;
ог-огзы+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl3+Acc:одӥгзэс-огзы K ;

ог-огмы+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl1+Gen:одӥгмылэн-огмы K ;
ог-огды+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl2+Gen:одӥгдылэн-огды K ;
ог-огзы+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl3+Gen:одӥгзылэн-огзы K ;

ог-огмы+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl1+Abl:одӥгмылэсь-огмы K ;
ог-огды+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl2+Abl:одӥгдылэсь-огды K ;
ог-огзы+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl3+Abl:одӥгзылэсь-огзы K ;

ог-огмы+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl1+Dat:одӥгмылы-огмы K ;
ог-огды+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl2+Dat:одӥгдылы-огды K ;
ог-огзы+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl3+Dat:одӥгзылы-огзы K ;

ог-огмы+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl1Abe:одӥгмытэк-огмы K ;
ог-огды+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl2Abe:одӥгдытэк-огды K ;
ог-огзы+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl3Abe:одӥгзытэк-огзы K ;

ог-огмы+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl1+Advl:одӥгмыя-огмы K ;
ог-огды+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl2+Advl:одӥгдыя-огды K ;
ог-огзы+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl3+Advl:одӥгзыя-огзы K ;

ог-огмы+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl1+Apr:одӥгмылань-огмы K ;
ог-огды+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl2+Apr:одӥгдылань-огды K ;
ог-огзы+v3+Pron+Recip+Pl3+Apr:одӥгзылань-огзы K ;

LEXICON MUTUAL-RECIPROC
 NOM_THEN_K ;
 GEN_THEN_K ;
 ABL_THEN_K ;
 DAT_THEN_K ;
 ABE_THEN_K ;
+Advl:%>я K ;
 APR_THEN_K ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

LEXICON INDEFINITE-PRON
та+Pron+Dem+Sg:та PRON-PERS-SG3_ ;!со:со
та+Pron+Dem+Pl:та%>ъёс PRON-PERS-PL3_ ;!соос
